Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3174
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-3174 to 77-3177 shall be known and may be cited as the Domestic Violence and Human Trafficking Service Providers Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2026, LB901, § 1.
January 1, 2027